Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3402
Political subdivisions; budget limitation; petition; election; procedure.

If the voters of any political subdivision of the state authorized to levy a tax or cause a tax to be levied determine that a limitation of the budget of the political subdivision funded by property taxes is needed, they may call for an election for that purpose. When ten percent of the registered voters of any political subdivision sign a petition calling for a limitation on the budget funded by property taxes, the question of such budget limitation shall be placed before the voters at a general, primary, or special election. The petition shall be filed with the governing body of the political subdivision. The budget limitation shall be adopted if approved by a majority of those voting on the question. Voting at such general, primary, or special election shall be by those persons who are authorized to vote for the members of the governing body of such political subdivision. For the purposes of the Local Option Tax Control Act, the term budget funded by property taxes shall include all funds the source of which is a property tax, regardless of the purpose of such funds, except such funds as are necessary to pay interest on and for retiring, funding, or servicing bonded indebtedness during the upcoming fiscal year.

Laws 1978, Spec. Sess., LB 2, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 17, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 188;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 160.